Wisconsin, session 2025, SB403.
do enact as follows:SB403,13Section 1. 11.0103 (6) of the statutes is created to read:SB403,2,4411.0103 (6) Online credit card contributions. (a) No committee, conduit, 5or political party may accept any contribution made with a credit card via the 1Internet unless the person making the contribution provides to the committee, 2conduit, or political party, at the time of making the contribution, the credit card 3verification value or code and, except as provided in par. (b), the billing address 4associated with the credit card is located in the United States.SB403,2,95(b) If the contribution under par. (a) is made by a U.S. citizen living outside of 6the United States, and the credit card billing address is not a location in the United 7States, the individual shall provide to the committee, conduit, or political party, at 8the time of making the contribution, the mailing address of the location in the 9United States that the individual uses for voter registration purposes.SB403,2,1210(c) The treasurer of each committee, conduit, or political party shall maintain 11the names and addresses of each person making a contribution under this 12subsection for purposes of making the reports required under this chapter.SB403,2,1713(d) Any financial institution that processes credit card contributions via the 14Internet to a committee, conduit, or political party without requiring the credit card 15verification value or code and a billing address located in the United States is 16subject to a forfeiture in an amount equal to the cumulative amount of such 17contributions.SB403,2,1818